cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Potraviny > Ovoce a zelenina > Čerstvé a mražené ovoce > Citrusové plody: Cedráty; Grapefruity; Kumkvat; Citróny; Limonela; Limetky; Mandarinky; Pomeranče; Pomela; Minneola; Yuzu
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 食品 > 蔬果 > 新鮮/冷凍水果 > 柑橘類: 香櫞; 葡萄柚; 金桔; 檸檬; 萊姆金桔; 萊姆; 柑橘與橘子; 柳橙; 柚子; 橘柚; 柚子
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Aliments > Fruits et légumes > Fruits frais et surgelés > Agrumes: Cédrats; Pamplemousses; Kumquats; Citrons; Limequats; Citrons verts; Mandarines et tangerines; Oranges; Pomélos; Tangelos; Yuzus
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Alimenti > Frutta e verdura > Frutta fresca e congelata > Agrumi: Cedri; Pompelmi; Kumquat; Limoni; Limequat; Lime; Mandarini e clementine; Arance; Pomeli; Tangeli; Yuzu
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Hàng thực phẩm > Trái cây và rau > Hoa quả tươi và đông lạnh > Cam quít: Quả thanh yên; Bưởi; Quả quất; Chanh vàng; Chanh quất; Chanh xanh; Quả quýt; Cam; Bưởi; Bưởi lai quýt; Quả yuzu
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Maisto prekės > Vaisiai ir daržovės > Švieži ir šaldyti vaisiai > Citrusiniai vaisiai: Citrinos; Greipfrutai; Kinkanai; Citrinos; Puscitrinės; Žaliosios citrinos; Mandarinai ir tangerinai; Apelsinai; Pomelai; Tangelai; Judzu
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Food Items > Fruits & Vegetables > Fresh & Frozen Fruits > Citrus Fruits: Citrons; Grapefruits; Kumquats; Lemons; Limequats; Limes; Mandarins & Tangerines; Oranges; Pomelos; Tangelos; Yuzu
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Prehrambeni artikli > Voće i povrće > Svježe i smrznuto voće > Citrusno voće: Citroni; Grejpfrut; Kumkvat; Limun; Limekvat; Limeta; Mandarine i tangerine; Naranče; Pomelo; Tanđelo; Yuzu
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Produse alimentare > Fructe și legume > Fructe proaspete și congelate > Citrice: Chitră; Grepfrut; Kumquat; Lămâi; Limequat; Limete; Mandarine și clementine; Portocale; Pomelo; Tangelo; Yuzu
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Żywność > Owoce i warzywa > Świeże i mrożone owoce > Cytrusy: Cytrony; Grejpfruty; Kumkwaty; Cytryny; Limekwaty; Limonki; Mandarynki i tangerynki; Pomarańcze; Pomelo; Tangelo; Yuzu
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Matvarer > Frukt og grønnsaker > Fersk og frossen frukt > Sitrusfrukter: Sitroner; Grapefrukter; Kumquater; Sitroner; Limquater; Lime; Mandariner og klementiner; Appelsiner; Pomelo; Tangeloer; Yuzu
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > รายการอาหาร > ผลไม้และผัก > ผลไม้สดและแช่แข็ง > ผลไม้ตระกูลส้ม: ส้มโอมือ; ผลไม้จำพวกส้ม; ส้มจี๊ด; มะนาว; ไลม์ควอท; ไลม์; ส้มแมนดารินและส้มเขียวหวาน; ส้ม; ส้มโอ; แทนเจโล; ส้มยูซุ
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 食品 > 蔬菜/水果 > 新鲜/冷冻水果 > 柑橘类水果: 香橼; 葡萄柚; 金橘/柑; 柠檬; 来檬金柑; 酸橙; 橘子和蜜橘; 桔子/橙子/柑橘; 柚子; 橘柚; 日本柚子
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 식품 > 과일/야채 > 신선/냉동 과일 > 감귤류: 시트론; 자몽; 금귤; 레몬; 라임콰트; 라임; 만다린 및 탠저린; 오렌지; 포멜로; 탄젤로; 유자
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Пищевые продукты > Фрукты и овощи > Свежие и замороженные фрукты > Цитрусовые: Цитроны; Грейпфруты; Кумкваты; Лимоны; Лаймкваты; Лаймы; Мандарины и танжерины; Апельсины; Помело; Танжело; Юдзу
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Alimentos > Frutas e vegetais > Frutas frescas e congeladas > Frutas cítricas: Cidras; Toranjas; Kumquats; Limões; Limequats; Limas; Mandarinas e tangerinas; Laranjas; Pomelos; Tangelos; Yuzu
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Fødevarer > Frugt og grøntsager > Frisk og frossen frugt > Citrusfrugter: Cedrat-citroner; Grapefrugt; Kumquat; Citroner; Limequat; Limefrugt; Mandariner og tangeriner; Appelsiner; Pomeloer; Tangelo; Yuzu
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Хранителни продукти > Плодове и зеленчуци > Пресни и замразени плодове > Цитрусови плодове: Цитрони; Грейпфрути; Кумкуат; Лимони; Лаймкуат; Лимети; Мандарини; Портокали; Помело; Танджело; Юзу
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Prehrambeni izdelki > Sadje in zelenjava > Sveže in zamrznjeno sadje > Citrusi: Citroni; Grenivke; Kumkvat; Limone; Limete; Limete; Mandarine in tangerine; Pomaranče; Pomelo; Tangelo; Juzu
ja: 食品・飲料 > 食品 > 野菜・果物 > 果物・冷凍フルーツ > 柑橘類: シトロン; グレープフルーツ; キンカン; レモン; ライムカット; ライム; マンダリン・タンジェリン; みかん・オレンジ; ポメロ; タンジェロ; ゆず
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Voedselitems > Fruit en groente > Vers en diepvriesfruit > Citrusvruchten: Cederappels; Grapefruits; Kumquats; Citroenen; Limequats; Limoenen; Mandarijnen en tangerines; Sinaasappelen; Pomelo's; Tangelo's; Yuzu
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Artigos alimentares > Frutas e vegetais > Fruta fresca e congelada > Citrinos: Cidras; Toranjas; Kumquats; Limões; Limequats; Limas; Mandarinas e tangerinas; Laranjas; Pomelos; Tangelos; Yuzu
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Lebensmittel > Obst & Gemüse > Frisches & Tiefgefrorenes Obst > Zitrusfrüchte: Zitronatzitronen; Grapefruits; Kumquats; Zitronen; Limequats; Limetten; Mandarinen & Clementinen; Orangen; Pomelos; Tangelos; Yuzu
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Livsmedel > Frukter och grönsaker > Färsk och fryst frukt > Citrusfrukter: Suckatcitroner; Grapefrukt; Kumquat; Citron; Limequat; Lime; Mandariner & tangeriner; Apelsin; Pomelo; Minneola; Yuzu
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Είδη διατροφής > Φρούτα & λαχανικά > Φρέσκα & κατεψυγμένα φρούτα > Εσπεριδοειδή: Κίτρα; Γκρέιπφρουτ; Κουμκουάτ; Λεμόνια; Λαιμκουάτ; Λάιμ; Μανταρίνια; Πορτοκάλια; Πόμελο; Ταντζέλο; Γιούζου
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Alimentos > Frutas y verduras > Frutas frescas y congeladas > Cítricos: Cidras; Pomelos; Kumquats; Limones; Limequats; Limas; Mandarinas; Naranjas; Pomelos; Tangelos; Yuzu
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Potraviny > Ovocie a zelenina > Čerstvé a mrazené ovocie > Citrusové plody: Citróny; Grapefruity; Kumquaty; Citróny; Limequaty; Limetky; Mandarínky a tangerínky; Pomaranče; Pomelá; Tangelo; Yuzu
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Élelmiszertételek > Gyümölcsök és Zöldségek > Friss és fagyasztott gyümölcsök > Citrus gyümölcsök: Cédrátcitromok; Grapefruitok; Kumkvatok; Citromok; Limequatok; Limeok; Mandarinok; Narancsok; Pomelók; Tangelok; Yuzu
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Yiyecek Çeşitleri > Meyve ve Sebzeler > Taze ve Dondurulmuş Meyveler > Turunçgiller: Ağaç kavunu; Greyfurt; Kumkat; Limon; Limequat; Misket Limonu; Mandalina; Portakal; Pomelo; Tangelo; Yuzu
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Ruokatuotteet > Hedelmät ja kasvikset > Tuoreet ja pakastetut hedelmät > Sitrushedelmät: Sukaattisitruunat; Greipit; Kumkvatit; Sitruunat; Limequatit; Limet; Mandariinit ja tangeriinit; Appelsiinit; Pomelot; Tangelot; Yuzu